Massachusetts, session 194th, H1250.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 175, of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:
Section 231.
(a) If a policy, contract, certificate, or agreement offered, issued, delivered, or renewed,
whether or not in Massachusetts, that provides, backs up, reinsures, or funds, in whole or in part,
life insurance, health insurance, annuities, accident insurance, long term care insurance, or
disability insurance coverage for any Massachusetts resident contains a provision that reserves
discretionary authority to the insurer, or an agent of the insurer, to determine eligibility for
benefits or coverage, to interpret the terms of the policy, contract, certificate, or agreement, or to
provide standards of interpretation or review that are inconsistent with the laws of this state, that
provision is void and unenforceable.
of 3

(b) For purposes of this section, "renewed" means continued in force on or after the
policy's anniversary date.
(c) For purposes of this section, the term "discretionary authority" means a policy
provision that has the effect of conferring discretion on an insurer or other claim administrator to
determine entitlement to benefits or interpret policy language that, in turn, could lead to a
deferential standard of review by any reviewing court.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits an insurer from including a provision in a contract
that informs an insured that as part of its routine operations the insurer applies the terms of its
contracts for making decisions, including making determinations regarding eligibility, receipt of
benefits and claims, or explaining policies, procedures, and processes, so long as the provision
could not give rise to a deferential standard of review by any reviewing court.
(e) The Commissioner of Insurance (“Commissioner”) shall not approve any health, life
or disability policy for issuance or delivery in Massachusetts in any of the following
circumstances:
If it includes a provision that reserves discretionary authority, as defined by Section 226,
to the insurer, or an agent of the insurer, to determine eligibility for benefits or coverage or to
interpret the terms of the policy; or if it provides standards of interpretation or review that are
inconsistent with the laws of Massachusetts; or if it contains or incorporates by reference, where
the incorporation is otherwise permissible, any inconsistent, ambiguous, or misleading clauses or
exceptions and conditions that deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in the general
coverage of the contract; or if it has any title, heading, or other indication of its provisions that is
misleading; or if it is printed or otherwise reproduced in a manner that renders any provision of
of 3

the form substantially illegible; or if it fails to conform in any respect with any law of
Massachusetts.
(f) If any provision of this Section or its application to any person or circumstance is
held to be illegal, invalid, or unenforceable, no other provisions or applications of this Section
that can be given effect without the illegal, invalid or unenforceable provision or application
shall be affected; and to this end the provisions of this Section are severable.
of 3